Maine, session 132, LD1340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4210-H is enacted to read:
§4210-H. Municipal Stream Crossing Fund; grant program
1. Fund established. The Municipal Stream Crossing Fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established within and is administered by the department to issue grants in
accordance with this section. The fund consists of proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized for the purposes of the grant program established pursuant to subsection 2 and
funds received as appropriations, allocations and contributions from public and private
sources. The fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and
accounts. Interest earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. Any unexpended
balances remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year do not lapse and must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
2. Grants. The department shall establish a competitive grant program to provide
grants to eligible project sponsors for stream crossing replacements on municipal roads.
Eligible project sponsors include local governments, municipal conservation commissions,
soil and water conservation districts and private nonprofit organizations.
3. Fund proceeds; uses. The department may award grants based on the extent to
which the proposed project allows communities to more effectively prepare for storm and
flood events and advances the goals of restoring habitat for fish, including sea-run fish and
native brook trout, and wildlife. In awarding grants, the department shall consider:
A. The priority status of the stream crossing replacement for native brook trout and
sea-run fish restoration, based on available stream survey data, statewide prioritization
for aquatic connectivity and presence in priority watersheds of salmon, river herring
and other diadromous fish;
B. The extent to which the proposed stream crossing replacement is sized to be 1.2
times the stream's bankfull width, and the stream crossing replacement is sized to meet
the department's 100-year flood standards;
Page 1 - 132LR1678(03)

C. The degree of urgency of the proposed project, including whether a stream crossing
is at high risk of failure due to age, condition or location within a watershed or reach
with high flood risk or severe flood history;
D. The expected contribution to reducing the frequency or severity of flooding to
upstream and downstream communities and improving storm water management
within the proposed project area; and
E. The extent to which the proposed project represents an efficient and cost-effective
investment, including the proportion of total project funding provided from other
sources and the potential avoided costs associated with the proposed project.
4. Grant proceeds; prohibited uses. Grants awarded under subsection 3 may not be
used:
A. To cover all of the costs associated with a proposed project; or
B. For a stream crossing replacement on a state road or private road.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Municipal Stream Crossing Fund N529
Initiative: Establishes the Municipal Stream Crossing Fund within the Department of
Transportation with base Other Special Revenue Funds allocations and Federal
Expenditures Fund allocations.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 2 - 132LR1678(03)